Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 2 Campaign Contributions

Administrative rules and regulations.

Disclosure reports, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-3.

Committees, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-4.

Disposition of contributions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-5.

Campaign contributions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-6.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).

21-5-30.
Contributions made to candidate or campaign committee or for recall of a public officer.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of Code Section 21-5-34, no contributions to bring about the nomination or election of a candidate for any office shall be made or accepted except directly to or by a candidate or such candidate’s campaign committee which is organized for the purpose of bringing about the nomination or election of any such candidate; and no contributions to bring about the recall of a public officer or to oppose the recall of a public officer or to bring about the approval or rejection by the voters of a proposed constitutional amendment, state-wide referendum, or proposed question at the state, municipal, or county level shall be made or accepted except directly to or by a campaign committee organized for that purpose.

Each candidate shall maintain records and file reports as required by this chapter or shall have a campaign committee for the purposes of maintaining records and filing reports as required by this chapter. Every campaign committee shall have a chairperson and a treasurer, except that the candidate may serve as the chairperson and treasurer. Before a campaign committee accepts contributions, the name and address of the chairperson and treasurer shall be filed with the commission. When a candidate has been elected to public office, the registration of that candidate’s campaign committee with the commission shall remain in effect so long as the candidate remains in office until and unless the registration is canceled by the campaign committee or the candidate. The same person may serve as chairperson and treasurer. No contributions shall be accepted by or on behalf of the campaign committee at a time when there is a vacancy in the office of chairperson or treasurer of the campaign committee.

Contributions of money received pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be deposited in a campaign depository account opened and maintained by the candidate or the campaign committee. The account may be an interest-bearing account; provided, however, that any interest earned on such account shall be reported and may only be used for the purposes allowed for contributions under this chapter. Those who elect the separate accounting option as provided in Code Section 21-5-43 may also open, but are not required to open, a separate campaign depository account for each election for which contributions are accepted and allocated beyond their next upcoming election.

Unless otherwise reported individually, where separate contributions of less than $100.00 are knowingly received from a common source, such contributions shall be aggregated for reporting purposes. For purposes of fulfilling such aggregation requirement, members of the family, members of the same firm or partnership, or employees of the same person, as defined in paragraph (19) of Code Section 21-5-3, shall be considered to be a common source; provided, however, that the purchase of tickets for not more than $25.00 each and for or attendance at a fundraising event by members of the family, members of the same firm or partnership, or employees of the same person shall not be considered to be contributions from a common source except to the extent that tickets are purchased as a block.

The making and acceptance of anonymous contributions are prohibited. Any anonymous contributions received by a candidate or campaign committee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the state treasury, and the fact of such contribution and transmittal shall be reported to the commission.

For purposes of this subsection, the term:

“Public utility corporation regulated by the Public Service Commission” includes, but is not limited to, an electric membership corporation.

“Electric membership corporation” means a public utility corporation regulated by the Public Service Commission operating as an electric membership corporation under the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46.

Except as limited by Code Section 21-5-30.1 or this subsection, a public utility corporation regulated by the Public Service Commission shall be allowed to make contributions to political campaigns. Any contributions made by a public utility corporation regulated by the Public Service Commission to a political campaign shall not be included as recoverable costs in any rate-making or rate-setting proceedings before the Public Service Commission. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Code section or any other provision of law to the contrary, no electric membership corporation and no nonprofit corporation, group, or association, the membership of which consists of electric membership corporations, shall be authorized to make any contribution to a political campaign. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit a nonprofit corporation, group, or association, the membership of which consists of electric membership corporations, from establishing, administering, and soliciting contributions for a political action committee from officers, directors, employees, agents, contractors, and members of such entities so long as such actions and contributions do not otherwise violate the provisions of this chapter.

Neither a candidate who is not a public officer nor his or her campaign committee may lawfully accept a campaign contribution until the candidate has filed with the commission a declaration of intention to accept campaign contributions which shall include the name and address of the candidate and the names and addresses of his or her campaign committee officers, if any; provided, however, that a candidate, as defined in subparagraphs (F) and (G) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3, shall make filings of the same kind and in the same manner as provided in this subsection for other public officers except that filings under this subsection shall be made with the election superintendent of the county in the case of public officers as defined in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3 and shall be made with the municipal clerk in the municipality of election or, if there is no clerk, with the chief executive officer of the municipality in the case of public officers as defined in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3. The election superintendent, municipal clerk, or chief executive officer, as applicable, shall transmit electronically by eFiling or eFax a copy of each such declaration of intention to the commission not later than ten days after the close of the reporting period.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, § 9; Ga. L. 1987, p. 458, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 603, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 922, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1092, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 10/HB 48; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 10/SB 17; Ga. L. 2011, p. 569, § 1/SB 160; Ga. L. 2014, p. 9, § 1/SB 297.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘ Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia Campaign Finance and Disclosure Law,” see 27 Ga. St. B. J. 175 (1991).

For note on the 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-30.1.
Contributions by regulated entities to elected executive officers or candidates.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the definitions set forth in Code Section 21-5-3 shall be applicable to the provisions of this Code section. As used in this Code section, the term:

“Campaign committee” means the candidate, person, or committee which accepts contributions to bring about the nomination for election or election of an individual to the office of an elected executive officer.

“Contribution” means a gift, subscription, membership, loan, forgiveness of debt, advance or deposit of money, or anything of value conveyed or transferred for the purpose of influencing the nomination for election or election of an individual to the office of an elected executive officer or encouraging the holder of such office to seek reelection. The term “contribution” shall include the payment of a qualifying fee for and on behalf of a candidate for the office of an elected executive officer and any other payment or purchase made for and on behalf of the holder of the office of an elected executive officer or for or on behalf of a candidate for that office when such payment or purchase is made for the purpose of influencing the nomination for election or election of the candidate and is made pursuant to the request or authority of the holder of such office, the candidate, the campaign committee of the candidate, or any other agent of the holder of such office or the candidate. The term “contribution” shall not include the value of personal services performed by persons who serve on a voluntary basis without compensation from any source.

“Elected executive officer” means the Secretary of State, Attorney General, State School Superintendent, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, and members of the Public Service Commission.

“Political action committee” means any committee, club, association, partnership, corporation, labor union, or other group of persons which receives donations aggregating in excess of $1,000.00 during a calendar year from persons who are members or supporters of the committee and which distributes these funds as contributions to one or more campaign committees of candidates for public office. Such term does not mean a campaign committee.

“Regulated entity” means any person who is required by law to be licensed by an elected executive officer or a board under the jurisdiction of an elected executive officer, any person who leases property owned by or for a state department, any person who engages in a business or profession which is regulated by an elected executive officer or by a board under the jurisdiction of an elected executive officer, or any public utility corporation regulated by the Public Service Commission. For purposes of this paragraph, public utility corporation regulated by the Public Service Commission shall have the same meaning as provided by subsection (f) of Code Section 21-5-30.

No regulated entity and no person or political action committee acting on behalf of a regulated entity shall make a contribution to or on behalf of a person holding office as an elected executive officer regulating such entity or to or on behalf of a candidate for the office of an elected executive officer regulating such entity or to or on behalf of a campaign committee of any such candidate.

No person holding office as an elected executive officer and no candidate for the office of an elected executive officer and no campaign committee of a candidate for the office of an elected executive officer shall accept a contribution in violation of subsection (b) of this Code section.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to prevent any person who may be employed by a regulated entity, including a person in whose name a license or lease is held, or who is an officer of a regulated entity from voluntarily making a campaign contribution from that person’s personal funds to or on behalf of a person holding office as an elected executive officer regulating such entity or to or on behalf of a candidate for the office of an elected executive officer regulating such entity or to or on behalf of a campaign committee of any such candidate; provided, however, that:

The elected executive officer or candidate receiving one or more campaign contributions described in this subsection shall in his or her disclosure report under Code Section 21-5-34 separately identify each contribution and the total of contributions which he or she knows or should have reason to know are described in this subsection; and

It shall be unlawful for any regulated entity or elected executive officer to require another by coercive action to make any such contribution.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-30.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 784, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 4A; Ga. L. 2009, p. 620, § 2/SB 168; Ga. L. 2011, p. 569, § 2/SB 160.

Law reviews.

For note the on the 1989 enactment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 240 (1989).

For note on the 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

21-5-30.2.
Contributions by public agencies.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the definitions set forth in Code Section 21-5-3 shall be applicable to the provisions of this Code section. As used in this Code section, the term:

“Agency” means:

Every state department, agency, board, bureau, commission, and authority;

Every county, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision of this state;

Every department, agency, board, bureau, commission, authority, or similar body of each such county, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of this state; and

Every city, county, regional, or other authority established pursuant to the laws of this state.

“Contribution” means a gift, subscription, membership, loan, forgiveness of debt, advance or deposit of money, or anything of value conveyed or transferred by or on behalf of an agency, without receipt of payment therefor, to any campaign committee, political action committee, or political organization or to any candidate for campaign purposes.

“Elector” means any person who shall possess all of the qualifications for voting now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state and who shall have registered in accordance with Chapter 2 of this title.

“Political action committee” means any committee, club, association, partnership, corporation, labor union, or other group of persons which receives donations aggregating in excess of $1,000.00 during a calendar year from persons who are members or supporters of the committee and which distributes these funds as contributions to one or more campaign committees of candidates for public office. Such term does not mean a campaign committee.

“Political organization” means an affiliation of electors organized for the purpose of influencing or controlling the policies and conduct of government through the nomination of candidates for public office and, if possible, the election of its candidates to public office.

“Public meeting place” means any county, municipal, or other public building suitable and ordinarily used for public gatherings.

No agency and no person acting on behalf of an agency shall make, directly or indirectly, any contribution to any campaign committee, political action committee, or political organization or to any candidate; but nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the furnishing of office space, facilities, equipment, goods, or services to a public officer for use by the public officer in such officer’s fulfillment of such office.

No campaign committee, political action committee, or political organization or candidate shall accept a contribution in violation of subsection (b) of this Code section.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to:

Affect the authority of the State Personnel Board regarding the regulation of certain political activities of public employees in the classified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2;

Affect the authority of any agency regarding the regulation of the political activities of such agency’s employees;

Affect the use of the capitol building and grounds as specified in Code Section 50-16-4; or

Prohibit the use of public meeting places by political organizations when such meeting places are made available to different political organizations on an equal basis; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not be construed to create a right for a political organization to use a public meeting place.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-30.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 368, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 261, § 1/SB 456; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-31/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

21-5-31.
[Reserved] Contributions or expenditures other than through candidate or committee; disclosure of extensions of credit.

History.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1431, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 603, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 790, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 11/HB 48, effective January 9, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 11/HB 48 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 9, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 repeal of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-32.
Accounts to be kept by candidate or campaign committee treasurer.

The candidate or treasurer of each campaign committee shall keep detailed accounts, current within not more than five business days after the date of receiving a contribution or making an expenditure, of all contributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of the candidate or committee. The candidate or treasurer shall also keep detailed accounts of all deposits and of all withdrawals made to the separate campaign depository account and of all interest earned on any such deposits.

Accounts kept by the candidate or treasurer of a campaign committee pursuant to this Code section may be inspected under reasonable circumstances before, during, or after the election to which the accounts refer by any authorized representative of the commission. The right of inspection may be enforced by appropriate writ issued by any court of competent jurisdiction.

Records of such accounts:

For a person or a campaign committee campaigning for an elective office with a term of less than four years, shall be preserved for three years from the date of the contribution, expenditure, gift, investment, or loan;

For a person or a campaign committee campaigning for an elective office with a term of four or more years, but fewer than six years, shall be preserved for five years from the date of the contribution, expenditure, gift, investment, or loan;

For a person or a campaign committee campaigning for an elective office with a term of six or more years, shall be preserved for seven years from the date of the contribution, expenditure, gift, investment, or loan; and

For any proposed constitutional amendment, referendum, or local issue or any recall vote, shall be preserved for three years from the date of contribution, expenditure, gift, investment, or loan.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 297, § 10; Ga. L. 1988, p. 603, § 3; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 8/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, substituted “depository account” for “depository” in the second sentence of subsection (a); and rewrote subsection (c), which read: “Records of such accounts kept by the candidate or campaign committee shall be preserved for three years from the termination date of the campaign for elective office conducted by the candidate or of the campaign committee for any candidate or for three years from the election to bring about the approval or rejection by the voters of any proposed constitutional amendment, referendum, or local issue or of any recall vote.”

21-5-33.
Disposition of contributions.

Contributions to a candidate, a campaign committee, or a public officer holding elective office and any proceeds from investing such contributions shall be utilized only to defray ordinary and necessary expenses, which may include any loan of money from a candidate or public officer holding elective office to the campaign committee of such candidate or such public officer, incurred in connection with such candidate’s campaign for elective office or such public officer’s fulfillment or retention of such office.

All contributions received by a candidate or such candidate’s campaign committee or a public officer holding elective office in excess of those necessary to defray expenses pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section and as determined by such candidate or such public officer may only be used as follows:

As donations to any charitable organization described in 26 U.S.C. 170(c) as said federal statute exists on March 1, 1986, and which additionally shall include educational, eleemosynary, and nonprofit organizations subject to the prohibitions contained in paragraph (2) of this subsection;

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, for transferral without limitation to any national, state, or local committee of any political party or to any candidate;

For transferral without limitation to persons making such contributions, not to exceed the total amount cumulatively contributed by each such transferee;

For use in future campaigns for only that elective office for which those contributions were received. With respect to contributions held on January 1, 1992, or received thereafter, in the event the candidate, campaign committee, or public officer holding elective office has not designated, prior to receiving contributions to which this Code section is applicable, the office for which campaign contributions are received thereby, those contributions shall be deemed to have been received for the elective office which the candidate held at the time the contributions were received or, if the candidate did not then hold elective office, those contributions shall be deemed to have been received for that elective office for which that person was a candidate most recently following the receipt of such contributions;

For repayment of any prior campaign obligations incurred as a candidate; or

For transfer without limitation to one or more political action committees.

Nothing in this Code section shall permit or authorize a candidate to utilize campaign funds for the purpose of making gifts, loans, or investments directly to:

The candidate;

A member of the candidate’s family;

Any business in which the candidate or a member of the candidate’s family has an ownership interest;

The candidate’s trust or a trust of a member of the candidate’s family; or

Any nonprofit organization of which the candidate or a member of the candidate’s family is on the payroll or has a controlling interest.

Any candidate or public officer holding elective office may provide in the will of such candidate or such public officer that the contributions shall be spent in any of the authorized manners upon the death of such candidate or such public officer; and, in the absence of any such direction in the probated will of such candidate or such public officer, the contributions shall be paid to the treasury of the state party with which such candidate or such public officer was affiliated in such candidate’s or such public officer’s last election or elective office after the payment of any expenses pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this paragraph, the personal representative or executor of the estate shall be allowed to use or pay out funds in the campaign account in any manner authorized in subparagraphs (A) through (E) of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Contributions and interest thereon, if any, shall not constitute personal assets of such candidate or such public officer.

Contributions received by a campaign committee designed to bring about the recall of a public officer holding elective office or to oppose the recall of a public officer holding elective office or any person or to bring about the approval or rejection by the voters of any proposed constitutional amendment, a state-wide referendum, or a proposed question which is to appear on the ballot in any county or municipal election and any proceeds derived from investing such contributions shall be utilized only to defray ordinary and necessary expenses associated with influencing the voters on such issue.

All contributions received by a campaign committee as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection in excess of those necessary to defray expenses relative to the influencing of voters on such issue as determined by the campaign committee may only be used as follows:

Contributions to any charitable organization described in 26 U.S.C. 170(c) as such federal statute exists on March 1, 1986, and which additionally shall include educational, eleemosynary, and nonprofit organizations; or

For repayment on a pro rata basis to persons making such contributions.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 458, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1327, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 5; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 9/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, in subparagraph (b)(1)(A), substituted “donations” for “contributions” at the beginning and added “subject to the prohibitions contained in paragraph (2) of this subsection” at the end; deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(D), substituted “; or” for a period at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(E), and added subparagraph (b)(1)(F); added paragraph (b)(2);
and redesignated former paragraph (b)(2) as present paragraph (b)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1327, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that nothing in that Act shall apply to or affect contributions lawfully converted to the personal use of a candidate or public officer prior to April 11, 1990.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

For article, “SB 221: The Creation of Election Leadership Committees,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (2021).